Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.190

Consent for service of process—Service, how made.

(1) Every applicant for registration under this chapter or person filing a claim of exemption under RCW 21.30.030(7) shall file with the administrator in such form as the administrator by rule prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the administrator or successor in office to be his or her attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the applicant or successor executor or administrator which arises under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the administrator, but it is not effective unless (a) the plaintiff, who may be the administrator in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the administrator, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to the defendant or respondent at the last address on file with the administrator, and (b) the plaintiff's affidavit of compliance with this subsection is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

(2) If a person, including a nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or any rule or order of the director, the engaging in the conduct shall constitute the appointment of the administrator as the person's attorney to receive service of any lawful process in a noncriminal proceeding against the person, a successor, or personal representative, which arises out of that conduct and which is brought under this chapter or any rule or order of the director with the same force and validity as if served personally.

[ 1987 c 243 s 5; 1986 c 14 s 20.]